test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTI_AM_IND_waabandam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTI - AM - waabandam :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4   5
  #per	neg     num     mod periph
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 311)
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+4+0SgO: waabndamni 

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: nwaabndaan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Pl+0SgO: [nwaabndaanaa, nwaabndaami]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gwaabndaan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+21Pl+0SgO: [gwaabndaanaa, gwaabndaami]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gwaabndaanaawaa
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0SgO: waabndaan #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+0SgO: waabndaanaawaa #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: NO IDEA
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+4: NO IDEA may need a third person prefix anyway, book indicates -w is 3 with no exp
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+4: NO IDEA may need a third person prefix anyway, book indicates -w is 3 with no exp
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+4+0SgO: waabndamnigba #book omits struc w

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: nwaabndaanaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Pl+0SgO: nwaabndaamnaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gwaabndaanaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+21Pl+0SgO: gwaabndaamnaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gwaabndaanaawaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+0SgO: waabndaanaaba #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+0SgO: waabndaanaawaaba #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Prt+X: NO IDEA
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: nwaabndaanaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Pl+0SgO: nwaabndaamnaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gwaabndaanaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+21Pl+0SgO: gwaabndaamnaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gwaabndaanaawaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+0SgO: waabndaanaadig #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+0SgO: waabndaanaawaadig #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Dub+X: NO IDEA
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Sg+0SgO: waabndamgoba #book omits struc w
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Pl+0SgO: waabndamgwaaba #book omits struc w
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+4+0PlO: waabndamniwan #? book mum, may not be possible 

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3, 5
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: nwaabndaanan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Pl+0PlO: [nwaabndaamnan, nwaabndaanaanin]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gwaabndaanan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+21Pl+0PlO: [gwaabndaanaanin, gwaabndaamnan]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gwaabndaanaawaan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0PlO: waabndaanan #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+0PlO: waabndaanaawaan #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+4+0PlO: NO IDEA
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+4+0PlO: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: nwaabndaanaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Pl+0PlO: nwaabndaamnaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: gwaabndaanaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+21Pl+0PlO: gwaabndaamnaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: gwaabndaanaawaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg+0PlO: waabndaanaabniin #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl+0PlO: waabndaanaawaabniin #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Prt+0PlO+X: NO IDEA
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: nwaabndaanaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Pl+0PlO: nwaabndaamnaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gwaabndaanaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+21Pl+0PlO: gwaabndaamnaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gwaabndaanaawaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg+0PlO: waabndaanaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl+0PlO: waabndaanaawaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Dub+0PlO+X: NO IDEA

     #most neg forms had to be synthesized, since ref grammar is extremely incomplete here
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+4+0SgO: waabndanziini 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: nwaabndanziin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Pl+0SgO: [nwaabndanziimi, nwaabndanziinaa]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gwaabndanziin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+21Pl+0SgO: [gwaabndanziimi, gwaabndanziinaa]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gwaabndanziinaawaa
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+0SgO: waabndanziin #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Pl+0SgO: waabndanziinaawaa #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+X: NO IDEA
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+4: NO IDEA may need a 3 prefix book puts -w for 3 with no explanation?
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+4: NO IDEA may need a 3 prefix book puts -w for 3 with no explanation?
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+4+0SgO: waabndanziin'goba #' #book omits struc w

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: nwaabndanziinaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Pl+0SgO: nwaabndanziimnaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gwaabndanziinaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+21Pl+0SgO: gwaabndanziimnaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gwaabndanziinaawaaba
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+0SgO: waabndanziinaaba #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+0SgO: waabndanziinaawaaba #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: NO IDEA
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: nwaabndanziinaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Pl+0SgO: nwaabndanziimnaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gwaabndanziinaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+21Pl+0SgO: gwaabndanziimnaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gwaabndanziinaawaadig
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+0SgO: waabndanziinaadig #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+0SgO: waabndanziinaawaadig #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: NO IDEA
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Sg+0SgO: waabndanziigba #book omits struc w
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Pl+0SgO: waabndanziigwaaba #book omits struc w
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+4+0PlO: waabndamniwan #? book mum, may not be possible 

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3, 5
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: nwaabndanziinan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Pl+0PlO: [nwaabndanziimnan, nwaabndanziinaanin]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gwaabndanziinan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+21Pl+0PlO: [gwaabndanziimnan, gwaabndanziinaanin]
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gwaabndanziinaawaan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+0PlO: waabndanziinan #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Pl+0PlO: waabndanziinaawaan #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+X: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+4+0PlO: NO IDEA
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+4+0PlO: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: nwaabndanziinaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Pl+0PlO: nwaabndanziimnaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: gwaabndanziinaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+21Pl+0PlO: gwaabndanziimnaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: gwaabndanziinaawaabniin
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+0PlO: waabndanziinaabniin #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+0PlO: waabndanziinaawaabniin #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlO+X: NO IDEA
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: nwaabndanziinaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Pl+0PlO: nwaabndanziimnaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gwaabndanziinaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+21Pl+0PlO: gwaabndanziimnaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gwaabndanziinaawaadgenan
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+0PlO: waabndanziinaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+0PlO: waabndanziinaawaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlO+X: NO IDEA
